Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1414
Initiative and referendum measures; counting, canvassing, and return of votes; proclamation by Governor.

The votes on initiative and referendum measures shall be counted, canvassed, and returned in the same manner as votes for candidates are counted, canvassed, and returned, and the abstract of votes made by the election commissioners or county clerks shall be returned on abstract sheets in the manner provided by section 32-1034 for abstracts of votes for state and county officers. The board of state canvassers shall canvass the votes upon each initiative or referendum measure in the same manner as is prescribed in the case of presidential electors. The Governor shall, within ten days of the completion of the canvass, issue his or her proclamation giving the whole number of votes cast in the state approving and rejecting each measure and declaring such measures as are approved by the constitutional number or majority of those voting to be in full force and effect as the law of the State of Nebraska from the date of such proclamation. If two or more measures are approved at such election which are known to conflict with each other or to contain conflicting provisions, the Governor shall also proclaim which is paramount in accordance with section 32-1416.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 396.